Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.787

Right to waive benefit—Irrevocable choice.

Any member receiving or having received a distribution under chapter 41.34 RCW may make an irrevocable choice to waive all rights to a benefit under RCW 41.40.790 by notifying the department in writing of their intention.

[ 2003 c 349 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 349: See note following RCW 41.32.837.